Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB39.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 153 of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER Z.6OTHER POWERS AND DUTIESSec.15399n. County humane officers.§ 15399n. County humane officers.The county commissioners may employ a county humane officer who shall be authorized to enforce dog control as defined in section 102 of the act of December 7, 1982 (P.L.784, No.225), known as the Dog Law, and animal cruelty laws of this Commonwealth as contained in 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 55 Subch. B (relating to cruelty to animals). In order to be eligible for 123456789101112131415161718 employment as a county humane officer, an individual must meet the training requirements contained in 22 Pa.C.S. §§ 3712 (relating to training program) and 3713 (relating to continuing education program).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0039PN0018 - 2 - 12345